Washington statutes.
RCW 18.92.128

Veterinary technician license.

The board shall issue a veterinary technician license to an individual who has:

(1) Successfully completed required examinations administered or approved by the board; and

(2) Successfully completed a posthigh school course approved by the board in the care and treatment of animals.

[ 2010 c 123 s 2; 2010 c 123 s 1; 2007 c 235 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 c 123 s 2: "Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1, 2015." [ 2010 c 123 s 3.]